New Jersey, session 221, S913.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, "long-term care facility" means a nursing home, assisted living residence, comprehensive personal care home, residential health care facility, or dementia care home licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    Each long-term care facility shall, within 60 days after the effective date of this act, report the total number of residents with a disability, the number of residents with each category of disability, which categories shall be determined by the Department of Health in consultation with the Department of Human Services, and the ranges in age of residents with each category of disability.  Thereafter, a long-term care facility shall report to the Department of Health whenever there is a change in the total number of residents with a disability, the number of residents with each category of disability, and the ranges in age of residents with each category of disability. c.     The Department of Health shall categorize data received pursuant to subsection b. of this section according to types of disability and publish on its Internet website on a quarterly basis the total number of residents with a disability, the number of residents  with each category of disability, and the ranges in age of the residents with each category of disability at each long-term care facility. 2.    The Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.